Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 3. Inspections, Examinations, Records, and Reports.

Sec. 06.20.160.
Inspection and examination of licensees.

For the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter or securing information required by it under this chapter, the department or its duly designated representative may investigate at any time the loans and business and examine the books, accounts, records, and files used in the business, of every licensee and of every person engaging in the business described in AS

06.20.010

, whether the person acts or claims to act as principal or agent, or under or without the authority of this chapter. For that purpose the department and its duly designated representative have free access to the office and place of business, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and vaults of all such persons. The department and all persons duly designated by it may require the attendance and examination under oath of all persons whose testimony it may require relative to the business.

History.

(§ 11(b) ch 73 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.170.
Periodic examination.

The department shall examine the affairs, business, office, and records of each licensee at least once every 18 months. Examination fees are to be charged to and paid by the licensee in accordance with AS

06.01.010

. The department may maintain an action for the recovery of the costs in any court of competent jurisdiction, with recourse to the bonds referred to in AS

06.20.050

and

06.20.080

.

History.

(§ 11(c) ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 47 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 2003)

Sec. 06.20.180.
Books and records of licensees.

Each licensee shall keep and use in the licensed premises those books, accounts, and records that will enable the department to determine whether the licensee is complying with this chapter and with the regulations lawfully adopted by the department under this chapter. The maintenance of separate books and records for another business authorized by the department under AS

06.20.210

is not required. The method of tracking and numbering the loans shall be determined by the licensee, as long as the system enables the department to perform the department’s obligations under this title. The licensee shall preserve the books, accounts, and records, including cards used in the card system, if any, for two years after making the final entry on any recorded loan.

History.

(§ 12 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 7 ch 134 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.190.
Annual reports of licensees.

Each licensee shall, on or before March 15 of each year, file a report with the department containing information as the department may reasonably require concerning the business and operations during the preceding calendar year of each licensed place of business conducted by the licensee inside the state. The report shall be made under oath and shall be in the form prescribed by the department, and shall be kept available as a public record.

History.

(§§ 11(a), 12 ch 73 SLA 1955)